Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.340

Impaired physician program—Entity records protected.

All entity records are not subject to disclosure pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2005 c 274 s 228; 1998 c 132 s 7; 1987 c 416 s 6. Formerly RCW 18.72.321.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1998 c 132: See notes following RCW 18.71.0195.

Effective date—1987 c 416: See note following RCW 18.71.300.